Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Chapter 7. Advertisements

§ 301.
Posting utility poles.

A person who paints or posts a sign, advertisement, or notice on a telegraph, telephone, or electric light pole shall be fined $5.00 for each offense.

§ 302.
Advertising littering streets and highways.

A person who by himself, herself, servant, or agent, advertises an entertainment or occupation, by throwing posters, bills, or advertising sheets of any kind, loose in a public street or highway, shall be fined not more than $50.00 nor less than $5.00, with costs.

§ 303.
Posting on private property.

A person who advertises his or her wares or occupations, by painting or posting notice of the same on fences or other private property, or on rocks or other natural objects, without leave of the owner, shall be fined $10.00.

§§ 304-307.
Repealed.
1979, No. 152 (Adj. Sess.).